Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 4
Protection of Property of Persons Under Disability and Minors

§ 15-5-401. Protective proceedings.

Upon petition and after notice and hearing in accordance with the provisions of this part, the court may appoint a conservator or make other protective order for cause as follows:

Appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in relation to the estate and affairs of a minor if the court determines that a minor owns money or property that requires management or protection which cannot otherwise be provided, has or may have business affairs which may be jeopardized or prevented by his minority, or that funds are needed for his support and education and that protection is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds.

Appointment of a conservator or other protective order may be made in relation to the estate and affairs of a person if the court determines that (1) the person is unable to manage his property and affairs effectively for reasons such as mental illness, mental disability, physical illness or disability, chronic use of drugs, chronic intoxication, confinement, detention by a foreign power, or disappearance; and (2) the person has property which will be wasted or dissipated unless proper management is provided, or that funds are needed for the support, care and welfare of the person or those entitled to be supported by him and that protection is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds.

§ 15-5-402. Protective proceedings — Jurisdiction of affairs of protected persons.

After the service of notice in a proceeding seeking the appointment of a conservator or other protective order and until termination of the proceeding, the court in which the petition is filed has:

Exclusive jurisdiction to determine the need for a conservator or other protective order until the proceedings are terminated;

Exclusive jurisdiction to determine how the estate of the protected person which is subject to the laws of this state shall be managed, expended or distributed to or for the use of the protected person or any of his dependents;

Concurrent jurisdiction to determine the validity of claims against the person or estate of the protected person and his title to any property or claim.

§ 15-5-403. Venue.

Venue for proceedings under this chapter is:

In the place in this state where the person to be protected resides whether or not a guardian has been appointed in another place; or

If the person to be protected does not reside in this state, in any place where he has property.

§ 15-5-404. Original petition for appointment or protective order.

The person to be protected, any person who is interested in his estate, affairs or welfare including his parent, guardian, or custodian, or any person who would be adversely affected by lack of effective management of his property and affairs may petition for the appointment of a conservator or for other appropriate protective order.

The petition shall set forth to the extent known, the interest of the petitioner; the name, age, residence and address of the person to be protected; the name and address of his guardian, if any; the name and address of his nearest relative known to the petitioner; a general statement of his property with an estimate of the value thereof, including any compensation, insurance, pension or allowance to which he is entitled; and the reason why appointment of a conservator or other protective order is necessary. If the appointment of a conservator is requested, the petition also shall set forth the name and address of the person whose appointment is sought and the basis of his priority for appointment.

The petition shall include a financial plan for the proposed actions of the conservator regarding the financial affairs of the protected person after appointment of the conservator, to the extent reasonably known to the petitioner at the time of filing of the petition. If the complete assets, income, expenses, debts and other financial concerns of the protected person are not reasonably known to the petitioner at the time the petition is filed, or if the petitioner is not the proposed conservator, then the conservator shall submit to the court, and to all interested persons, in writing, within the ninety (90) day inventory, as a part thereof, a financial plan covering all of the assets, income, expenses, debts and other financial concerns of the protected person. Such financial plan must also be given to any person who has filed a request for notice under section 15-5-406, Idaho Code, and to other persons as the court may direct. Such financial plan shall be given to all such persons in accordance with the methods set forth in section 15-1-401, Idaho Code. If the financial plan changes during any time period between the periodic reports of the conservator, the modified financial plan shall be filed with the next report as a part thereof. The financial plan and any modified financial plan filed pursuant to this subsection (c) shall be subject to examination and review by the court, or persons designated by the court to make such examination and review, as provided by rules adopted by the Idaho supreme court.

§ 15-5-405. Notice.

On a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order, notice shall be given in accordance with section 15-5-309, Idaho Code.

§ 15-5-406. Protective proceedings — Request for notice — Interested person.

Any person desiring notice of any order or filing in a protective proceeding described in this part involving a person in whom he is interested may file a request for notice with the court stating his name, the name of the alleged disabled person, the nature of the requesting person’s interest, and his address or that of his attorney. Upon payment of any fee required by statute or court rule, the clerk shall mail a copy of the request to the conservator if one has been appointed, or to the petitioner if there is no conservator. A request is effective only as to matters occurring after its filing.

§ 15-5-407. Procedure concerning hearing and order on original petition.

Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order because of minority, the court shall set a date for hearing on the matters alleged in the petition. If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the minor are or may be inadequately represented, it must appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the choice of the minor if fourteen (14) years of age or older. A lawyer appointed by the court to represent a minor has the powers and duties of a guardian ad litem.

Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order for reasons other than minority, the court shall set a date for hearing.

After hearing, upon finding that a basis of the appointment of a conservator or other protective order has been established, the court shall make an appointment or other appropriate order.

Unless the person to be protected has counsel of his own choice, the court may appoint a lawyer to represent him who then has the powers and duties of a guardian ad litem. If the alleged disability is mental illness, mental disability, physical illness or disability, advanced age, chronic use of drugs, or chronic intoxication, the court may direct that the person to be protected be examined by a physician designated by the court, preferably a physician who is not connected with any institution in which the person is a patient or is detained. The court may send a visitor to interview the person to be protected. The visitor may be a guardian ad litem or an officer or employee of the court.

§ 15-5-407A. Temporary and emergency appointments. — (a) The court may appoint upon an ex parte petition, without hearing, a person to act as temporary conservator, pending the final hearing, upon a finding supported by statement made under oath that an emergency situation exists. The emergency appointment shall remain in effect no longer than ninety (90) days, unless extended for good cause upon application of the temporary conservator.

(b) Any one (1) of the following shall be considered an emergency situation:

A finding that the person to be protected is unable to reasonably manage said person’s finances and as a result the person’s assets will be wasted or dissipated unless proper management is provided without delay; or

A finding that the person to be protected has been taken advantage of and that the situation is likely to continue unless a temporary appointment is made without delay; or

A finding that funds are needed for support, care and welfare of the person to be protected and a temporary appointment is necessary to secure such funding; or

A finding that other conditions exist that in the court’s determination necessitate the appointment of a temporary conservator.

The court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the temporary appointment within fourteen (14) days if requested by an interested party. In such event, if a visitor and physician have not already been appointed, the court shall appoint a visitor to meet with the alleged incapacitated person and to make a written report to the court, and shall appoint a physician to examine the proposed ward and submit a written report to the court giving preference to the appointment of the proposed ward’s treating physician if the proposed ward has a current treating physician.

(c) The duty of a temporary conservator shall be to preserve and protect the assets of the estate and to provide the funding necessary for the support, care and welfare of the person to be protected. The conservator shall have all the powers enumerated in section 15-5-424, Idaho Code, to be exercised, however, only within said limited context. The court may expand the duties of the temporary conservator upon application and a finding that a proposed action is necessary prior to the hearing.

(d) A temporary conservator shall not remove any of the assets of the estate from the jurisdiction of the court without a specific order to that effect.

(e) The petition for appointment of a temporary conservator must be accompanied by a petition for appointment of a conservator pursuant to section 15-5-404, Idaho Code.

(f) If the person to be protected is a minor, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for said minor at the same time the temporary appointment of a conservator is made.

(g) Upon application by an interested party and a hearing, the court may limit the powers and duties of the temporary conservator.

(h) Notice of the appointment of a temporary conservator shall be given to all interested persons by the petitioner within seventy-two (72) hours after the date of such appointment.

§ 15-5-408. Permissible court orders.

The court shall exercise the authority conferred in the part so as to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence of the protected person and make protective orders only to the extent necessitated by the protected person’s actual mental and adaptive limitations and other conditions warranting the procedure.

The court has the following powers which may be exercised directly or through a conservator in respect to the estate and affairs of protected persons:

While a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order is pending and after preliminary hearing and without notice to others, the court has power to preserve and apply the property of the person to be protected as may be required for his benefit or the benefit of his dependents.

After hearing and upon determining that a basis for an appointment or other protective order exists with respect to a minor without other disability, the court has all those powers over the estate and affairs of the minor which are or might be necessary for the best interests of the minor, his family and members of his household.

After hearing and upon determining that a basis for an appointment or other protective order exists with respect to a person for reasons other than minority, the court has, for the benefit of the person and members of his household, all the powers over his estate and affairs which he could exercise if present and not under disability, except the power to make a will. These powers include, but are not limited to power to make gifts, to convey or release his contingent and expectant interests in property including marital property rights and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entirety, to exercise or release his powers as trustee, personal representative, custodian for minors, conservator, or donee of a power of appointment, to enter into contracts, to create revocable or irrevocable trusts of property of the estate which may extend beyond his disability or life, to exercise options of the disabled person to purchase securities or other property, to exercise his right to elect options and change beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies and to surrender the policies for their cash value, to exercise his right to an elective share in the estate of his deceased spouse and to renounce any interest by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transfer.

The court may exercise or direct the exercise of, its authority to exercise or release powers of appointment of which the protected person is donee, to renounce interests, to make gifts in trust or otherwise exceeding twenty per cent (20%) of any year’s income of the estate or to change beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies, only if satisfied, after notice and hearing, that it is in the best interests of the protected person, and that he either is incapable of consenting or has consented to the proposed exercise of power.

An order made pursuant to this section determining that a basis for appointment of a conservator or other protective order exists, has no effect on the capacity of the protected person.

§ 15-5-409. Protective arrangements and single transactions authorized.

If it is established in a proper proceeding that a basis exists as described in section 15-5-401[, Idaho Code,] of this Part for affecting the property and affairs of a person the court, without appointing a conservator, may authorize, direct or ratify any transaction necessary or desirable to achieve any security, service, or care arrangement meeting the foreseeable needs of the protected person. Protective arrangements include, but are not limited to, payment, delivery, deposit or retention of funds or property, sale, mortgage, lease or other transfer of property, entry into an annuity contract, a contract for life care, a deposit contract, a contract for training and education, or addition to or establishment of a suitable trust.

When it has been established in a proper proceeding that a basis exists as described in section 15-5-401[, Idaho Code,] of this Part for affecting the property and affairs of a person the court, without appointing a conservator, may authorize, direct or ratify any contract, trust or other transaction relating to the protected person’s financial affairs or involving his estate if the court determines that the transaction is in the best interests of the protected person.

Before approving a protective arrangement or other transaction under this section, the court shall consider the interests of creditors and dependents of the protected person and, in view of his disability, whether the protected person needs the continuing protection of a conservator. The court may appoint a special conservator to assist in the accomplishment of any protective arrangement or other transaction authorized under this section who shall have the authority conferred by the order and serve until discharged by order after report to the court of all matters done pursuant to the order of appointment.

If it is established in a proper proceeding that a basis exists as described in section 15-5-401[, Idaho Code,] of this Part for affecting property and affairs of a person, the court may in its discretion, without appointing a conservator, order the establishment or continuation of a special needs trust as provided in chapter 14, title 68, Idaho Code.

§ 15-5-409a. Compromise of claim of minor — Procedure. — (1) When a minor has a claim for money against a third person, the persons or entities listed below have the right to petition for a compromise of the claim in the following order of priority:

An appointed conservator of the minor;

A guardian of the minor, if appointed;

Either or both parents, provided that:

If the parents are living separate and apart, then the parent who has been awarded primary physical custody; or

If no custody award has been made, the parent with whom the minor is living;

A de facto custodian; and

Any other legal representative.

The total amount of proceeds of the proposed compromise, the apportionment of those proceeds and whether the fees and expenses are to be deducted before or after the calculation of any contingency fee, including the amount to be used for:

Attorney’s fees and whether the attorney’s fees are fixed or contingent fees;

Medical expenses; or

Other expenses;

Whether the petitioner believes the acceptance of this compromise is in the best interest of the minor;

That the petitioner has been advised and understands that acceptance of the compromise will bar the minor from seeking further relief from the third person offering the compromise;

If the claim involves a personal injury suffered by the minor, a summary of:

The injury, prognosis, treatment and progress of recovery of the minor; and
(ii) The amount of medical expenses incurred to date, the nature and amount of medical expenses that have been paid and by whom, any amount owing for medical expenses and an estimate of the amount of medical expenses that may be incurred in the future; and

The policy limits of the insurance contract, if applicable.

(2) The court for good cause may pass over a person having priority under subsection (1) of this section and appoint a person having less priority or no priority; provided that the court shall not pass over a parent or parents unless the court concludes that the parent or parents are incapable or unwilling to act reasonably and in the best interest of the minor. Such proposed compromise is not effective until it is approved by the district court of the county where the minor resides or, if the minor is not a resident of the state of Idaho, by the district court of the county where the claim arose, upon verified petition, filed with the court.

(3) A verified petition made pursuant to this section shall include the following:

(a) The name, age and residence of the minor;

(b) The facts that bring the minor within the purview of this section, including the circumstances that make it a claim for money, the name of the third person against whom the claim is made and, if the claim is the result of an accident, the date, place and facts of the accident;

(c) The names and residence of the parents or guardian of the minor;

(d) The name and residence of the person or persons having physical custody or control of the minor;

(e) The name and residence of the petitioner, the relationship of the petitioner to the minor and the basis of the petitioner’s right to compromise the claim;

(4)(a) If the minor’s claim is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and the court is satisfied after review of the verified petition that the compromise is reasonable and in the best interest of the minor, the court may approve the compromise or set a hearing;

(b) If the minor’s claim is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, the court shall set a hearing for approval of the compromise.

(5) If the court finds the compromise is reasonable and in the best interest of the minor, the court may approve such compromise and may direct the money be paid:

(a) To the parents, guardian, trustee, conservator, legal representative or the designated payee thereof in accordance with this chapter;

(b) Subject to the provisions of an appropriate protective order; or

(c) In accordance with the provisions of chapter 14, title 68, Idaho Code.

(6) No filing fee shall be charged for the filing of any petition under the provisions of this section.

§ 15-5-410. Who may be appointed conservator — Priorities.

The court may appoint an individual, except as set forth hereafter, or a corporation with general power to serve as trustee, as conservator of the estate of a protected person. The following are entitled to consideration for appointment in the order listed:

An individual or corporation nominated by the protected person if he is fourteen (14) or more years of age and has, in the opinion of the court, sufficient mental capacity to make an intelligent choice;

The individual or corporation nominated as conservator of the protected person in the financial power of attorney of the protected person, or if no such nomination is made therein, the individual or corporation nominated as agent therein, provided that:

If the nomination is of coconservators, or coagents, as appropriate, the court may consider whether appointment of coconservators is in the best interests of the protected person or whether a sole conservator should be appointed;

If several individuals or corporations are nominated in order of priority, the court shall consider such nominations in that order of priority; and

If more than one (1) financial power of attorney made by the protected person exists, the court shall determine which financial power of attorney is appropriate to be the basis for nomination of a conservator;

The spouse of the protected person;

An adult child of the protected person;

A conservator, guardian of property or other like fiduciary, but not a fiduciary serving only as a trustee, appointed or recognized by the appropriate court of any other jurisdiction in which the protected person resides;

A parent of the protected person, or a person nominated by the will of a deceased parent;

Any relative of the protected person with whom he has resided for more than six (6) months prior to the filing of the petition;

A person nominated by the person who is caring for him or paying benefits to him.

A person in priorities (c), (d), (e), (f) or (g) of subsection (1) of this section may nominate in writing a person to serve in his stead. With respect to persons having equal priority, the court is to select the one who is best qualified of those willing to serve. The court for good cause, may pass over a person having priority and appoint a person having less priority or no priority.

No convicted felon shall be appointed as a conservator of the estate of a protected person unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that such appointment is in the best interests of the protected person.

§ 15-5-411. Bond.

The court may require a conservator to furnish a bond conditioned upon faithful discharge of all duties of the trust according to law, with sureties as it shall specify. Unless otherwise directed, the bond shall be in the amount of the aggregate capital value of the property of the estate in his control plus one (1) year’s estimated income minus the value of securities deposited under arrangements requiring an order by the court for their removal and the value of any land which the fiduciary, by express limitation of power, lacks power to sell or convey without court authorization. The court in lieu of sureties on a bond, may accept other security for the performance of the bond, including a pledge of securities or a mortgage of land.

§ 15-5-412. Terms and requirements of bonds.

The following requirements and provisions apply to any bond required under section 15-5-411[, Idaho Code,] of this Part:

Unless otherwise provided by the terms of the approved bond, sureties are jointly and severally liable with the conservator and with each other;

By executing an approved bond of a conservator, the surety consents to the jurisdiction of the court which issued letters to the primary obligor in any proceeding pertaining to the fiduciary duties of the conservator and naming the surety as a party defendant. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the surety or mailed to him by registered or certified mail at his address as listed with the court where the bond is filed and to his address as then known to the petitioner;

On petition of a successor conservator or any interested person, a proceeding may be initiated against a surety for breach of the obligation of the bond of the conservator;

The bond of the conservator is not void after the first recovery but may be proceeded against from time to time until the whole penalty is exhausted.

No proceeding may be commenced against the surety on any matter as to which an action or proceeding against the primary obligor is barred by adjudication or limitation.

§ 15-5-413. Acceptance of appointment — Consent to jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the estate that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the conservator, or mailed to him by registered or certified mail at his address as listed in the petition for appointment or as thereafter reported to the court and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

§ 15-5-414. Compensation and expenses.

If not otherwise compensated for services rendered or expenses incurred, any visitor, guardian ad litem, physician, conservator or special conservator appointed in a protective proceeding is entitled to reasonable compensation from the estate for services rendered and expenses incurred in such status, including for services rendered and expenses incurred prior to the actual appointment of said conservator or special conservator which were reasonably related to the proceedings. If any person brings or defends any conservatorship proceeding in good faith, whether successful or not, he or she is entitled to receive from the estate his or her necessary expenses and disbursements including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in such proceeding. If the estate is inadequate to bear any of the reasonable compensation, fees, and/or costs referenced in this section, the court may apportion the reasonable compensation, fees, and/or costs to any party, or among the parties, as the court deems reasonable.

§ 15-5-415. Death, resignation or removal of conservator.

The court may remove a conservator for good cause, upon notice and hearing, or accept the resignation of a conservator. After his death, resignation or removal, the court may appoint another conservator. A conservator so appointed succeeds to the title and powers of his predecessor.

§ 15-5-416. Petitions for orders subsequent to appointment.

Any person interested in the welfare of a person for whom a conservator has been appointed may file a petition in the appointing court for an order (1) requiring bond or security or additional bond or security, or reducing bond, (2) requiring an accounting for the administration of the trust, (3) directing distribution, (4) removing the conservator and appointing a temporary or successor conservator, or (5) granting other appropriate relief.

A conservator may petition the appointing court for instructions concerning his fiduciary responsibility.

Upon notice and hearing, the court may give appropriate instructions or make any appropriate order.

§ 15-5-417. General duty of conservator.

In the exercise of his powers, a conservator is to act as a fiduciary and shall observe the standards of care applicable to trustees as described by section 15-7-302[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

§ 15-5-418. Inventory and records. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 164, § 4, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 15-5-419. Reporting requirements for conservators.

Every conservator shall file with the court an inventory within ninety (90) days of appointment, an accounting at least annually, and a final accounting at the termination of the appointment of the conservator. All inventories and accountings shall be under oath or affirmation and shall comply with the Idaho supreme court rules. The court may require a conservator to submit to a physical check of the estate in his control, to be made in any manner the court may specify.

If a conservator:

Makes a substantial misstatement on filings of any required inventories or reports; or

Is guilty of gross impropriety in handling the property of the protected person; or

Willfully fails to file the report required by this section after receiving written notice of the failure to file and after a grace period of two (2) months have elapsed;

then the court may impose a fine in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) on the conservator. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem for the protected person on its own motion or on the motion of any interested party to represent the protected person in any proceedings hereunder and may also appoint appropriate persons or entities to make investigation of the actions of the conservator. The court may also order restitution of funds misappropriated from the estate of a protected person and may impose a surcharge upon the conservator responsible for such misappropriation for all damages, costs and other appropriate sums determined by the court, in addition to any fine imposed including, but not limited to, any fees and costs of the guardian ad litem. The court may take any other actions which are in the best interests of the protected person and the protection of the assets of the protected person. Any sums awarded hereunder shall be paid by the conservator and may not be paid by the estate of the protected person. The court may enter judgment against a conservator for any or all of the foregoing and may impose judgment against any bond of such conservator.

§ 15-5-420. Conservators — Title by appointment.

The appointment of a conservator vests in him title as trustee to all property of the protected person, presently held or thereafter acquired, including title to any property theretofore held for the protected person by custodians or attorneys in fact, or to the part thereof specified in the order. An order specifying that only a part of the property of the protected person vests in the conservator creates a limited conservatorship.

The appointment of a conservator is not a transfer or alienation within the meaning of general provisions of any federal or state statute or regulation, insurance policy, pension plan, contract, will or trust instrument, imposing restrictions upon or penalties for transfer or alienation by the protected person of his rights or interest, but this section does not restrict the ability of persons to make specific provision by contract or dispositive instrument relating to a conservator.

Until termination of his appointment, a conservator has the same power over the title to property of the protected person’s estate that an absolute owner would have, provided however, that such power is held in trust for the benefit of the protected person. This power may be exercised without notice, hearing, or order of the court.

§ 15-5-421. Recording of conservator’s letters.

Letters of conservatorship are evidence of transfer of all assets, or the part thereof specified in the letters, of a protected person to the conservator. An order terminating a conservatorship is evidence of transfer of all assets of the estate subjected to the conservatorship from the conservator to the protected person, or his successors. Letters of conservatorship and orders terminating conservatorship may be recorded in the office of the county recorder in any county in which property affected by such letters or orders is located and, from the time of filing the same for record, notice is imparted to all persons of the contents of such letters or orders.

§ 15-5-422. Sale, encumbrance or transaction involving conflict of interest — Voidable — Exceptions.

Any sale or encumbrance to a conservator, his spouse, agent or attorney, or any corporation or trust in which he has a substantial beneficial interest, or any transaction which is affected by a substantial conflict of interest is voidable unless the transaction is approved by the court after notice to interested persons and others as directed by the court.

§ 15-5-423. Persons dealing with conservators — Protection.

A person who in good faith either assists a conservator or deals with him for value in any transaction other than those requiring a court order as provided in section 15-5-408[, Idaho Code,] of this Part, is protected as if the conservator properly exercised the power. The fact that a person knowingly deals with a conservator does not alone require the person to inquire into the existence of a power or the propriety of its exercise, except that restrictions on powers of conservators which are endorsed on letters as provided in section 15-5-426[, Idaho Code,] of this Part are effective as to third persons. A person is not bound to see to the proper application of estate assets paid or delivered to a conservator. The protection here expressed extends to instances in which some procedural irregularity or jurisdictional defect occurred in proceedings leading to the issuance of letters. The protection here expressed is not by substitution for that provided by comparable provisions of the laws relating to commercial transactions and laws simplifying transfers of securities by fiduciaries.

§ 15-5-424. Powers of conservator in administration.

A conservator has all of the powers conferred herein and any additional powers conferred by law on trustees in this state. In addition, a conservator of the estate of an unmarried minor under the age of eighteen (18) years, as to whom no one has parental rights, has the duties and powers of a guardian of a minor described in section 15-5-209[, Idaho Code,] of this code until the minor attains the age of eighteen (18) years or marries, but the parental rights so conferred on a conservator do not preclude appointment of a guardian as provided by part 2[, chapter 5, title 15, Idaho Code,] of this chapter.

A conservator has power without court authorization or confirmation, to invest and reinvest funds of the estate as would a trustee.

A conservator, acting reasonably in efforts to accomplish the purpose for which he was appointed, may act without court authorization or confirmation to:

Collect, hold and retain assets of the estate including land in another state, until, in his judgment, disposition of the assets should be made, and the assets may be retained even though they include an asset in which he is personally interested;

Receive additions to the estate;

Continue or participate in the operation of any business or other enterprise;

Acquire an undivided interest in an estate asset in which the conservator, in any fiduciary capacity, holds an undivided interest;

Invest and reinvest estate assets in accordance with subsection (2) of this section;

Deposit estate funds in a bank including a bank operated by the conservator;

Acquire or dispose of an estate asset including land in another state for cash or on credit, at public or private sale; and to manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of or abandon an estate asset;

Make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in buildings or other structures, to demolish any improvements, to raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings;

Subdivide, develop or dedicate land to public use; to make or obtain the vacation of plats and adjust boundaries; to adjust differences in valuation on exchange or to partition by giving or receiving considerations; and to dedicate easements to public use without consideration;

Enter for any purpose into a lease as lessor or lessee with or without option to purchase or renew for a term within or extending beyond the term of the conservatorship;

Enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of minerals or other natural resources or enter into a pooling or unitization agreement;

Grant an option involving disposition of an estate asset, to take an option for the acquisition of any asset;

Vote a security, in person or by general or limited proxy;

Pay calls, assessments and any other sums chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities;

Sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; to consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the conservatorship so that title to the security may pass by delivery, but the conservator is liable for any act of the nominee in connection with the stock so held;

Insure the assets of the estate against damage or loss, and the conservator against liability with respect to third persons;

Borrow money to be repaid from estate assets or otherwise; to advance money for the protection of the estate or the protected person, and for all expenses, losses and liability sustained in the administration of the estate or because of the holding or ownership of any estate assets and the conservator has a lien on the estate as against the protected person for advances so made;

Pay or contest any claim; to settle a claim by or against the estate or the protected person by compromise, arbitration or otherwise; and to release, in whole or in part, any claim belonging to the estate to the extent that the claim is uncollectible;

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the conservator and other expenses incurred in the collection, care, administration and protection of the estate;

Allocate items of income or expense to either estate income or principal, as provided by law, including creation of reserves out of income for depreciation, obsolescence or amortization, or for depletion in mineral or timber properties;

Pay any sum distributable to a protected person or his dependent without liability to the conservator, by paying the sum to the distributee or by paying the sum for the use of the distributee either to his guardian or, if none, to a relative or other person with custody of his person;

Employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisors or agents, even though they are associated with the conservator to advise or assist him in the performance of his administrative duties; to act upon their recommendation without independent investigation; and instead of acting personally, to employ one (1) or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary;

Prosecute or defend actions, claims or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of estate assets and of the conservator in the performance of his duties;

Execute and deliver all instruments which will accomplish or facilitate the exercise of the powers vested in the conservator; and

Take control of, conduct, continue or terminate any accounts of the protected person on any social networking website, any microblogging or short message service website or any e-mail service website.